Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-156
Recording of notice of termination before abandonment or completion; owner; liability.

(1) If a contracting owner records a notice of termination before abandonment or substantial completion of all the improvements covered by the notice of commencement being terminated, he or she is personally liable to any lien claimant to the extent that the claimant is unable to realize on a lien because the notice of termination was recorded before abandonment or substantial completion.

(2) A notice of termination is effective even though the owner, under subsection (1) of this section, may be personally liable to lien claimants by reason of his or her recording the notice of termination.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 32.